src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/af/hyphenation/hyph_af.dic
ud6stoe
ud1s1t
u1d4s6ty2d
ud2sty
u1e
ueb5lo
ue1b2
uer7io1ne
ue1r2i
ueri1o
ue4ron
ue1ro
uer7onde
uero2n1d
ues7tri1a
ue1s1t
ues2
uest2r
uest1r2i
ue5u1ni
u4f1r2i
u1f2r
uf5rin
ufs6maa2
u2f1s2
uf3s1m
uf4s3ma
ug5aan1
u1ga
ugaa2
u4gei
u1ge
uge6s1ka
uge1s4k2
uges2
ug1l
u2go
ugo6mol
ugo2m
ugo3mo
ug3or
u2g3r
u2g3s2
ug2s4k2
ug2s4l
ug4soo2
ug2s3o
ugs4p
ug5ste
ug1s1t
ug4s6tek2
ug5sto
ug5s3ui
ug1su
ug4u1b2
u1gu
ui4da2g
ui2d
ui3da
uid7ar2t1s2
ui4da2r1t
ui4d3o
ui4d2r
uid7ree4k
uid1re
uid7si2m1b2
ui2d2s2
uid1si
uidsi2m
uid7ska1t
uid4s1ka
uid1sk2
uid7skel
uids1ke
uid7s4k2il
uids1ki
uid7slui
uid1s3l
uid5sp2r
uids3p
uids6to
uid1s1t
uid7s5toe
uid7ui2t1s2
ui3du
uidui2t
ui1e
uier2s6w
uie2rs2
uies6ma
uie2s1m
uies2
uie7smaa2
ui4f3a
uif7ee2n1d
ui1fe
ui4fee2n1
uif5le
uif1l
ui4go
ui4g3r
ui2g3s4
ui4k3a
ui4k3l
ui4k3r
uik7sfee
ui2k1s2
uik2s1f2
uiks1fe
uik6sta
uiks1t
uik7ui2t1k
ui1ku
ui4kui2t
ui4k2w
uil7aa2p.
u2il
ui1la
uilaa2
uilaa2p1
uil5e2k1s2
ui1le
uil7e3sel
uile3se
uiles2
ui4l5oo2
ui1lo
uil7tjan
uil1t
uilt2j
uil2tja
ui4ma
ui2m
uim7oe2s.
ui3mo
ui3moe
uimoes2
ui4na
ui5na1e
uin5ar
uin7asyn
uinas2
uina1sy
ui2n1d4
uin7drek
uin4d3re
uind2r
uin7ivoo2
ui3ni
uini1v2
uin7ko1le
uin4kol
ui2n1k
uin1ko
ui4n3o
uin7se2r.
ui2n1s2
uin1se
uin5si
uin6s1ka
uin1sk2
ui4p2l
ui2p
ui4po
uip5oo2
uip7o3r2e.
uipo1re
uip7roes2
ui3p2r
uipr4oe
ui4s3a
uis2
ui2s3j
ui4s3o
uis5ta
uis3t
ui4t3a
ui2t
uit7dein
ui2t1d
uit2dei
ui4t5ee
ui3te
ui5t4er
uit3j
uit3r
uit4s1j
ui2t1s2
uit6-as2
ui2t2-1
uk4aa2
u1ka
ukaar4
uk5loo2
u1k2l
u4kof
u1ko
uk5of1f
u4kor
u5kra1t
uk2r
uk3ry
uks2e4s2
u2k1s2
uk1se
uk4s1ki
uk1sk2
uk2s4m
uks7po2p.
uk2s1p
uks1po2p
uk4s1v2
uk4t1h2
u2k1t
uku7y4a3ma
u1ku
ukuy1a
ukuya2m
u2k3w
u1la
u2l3ag
uld5e2r1k
ul1d
ule6sta
u1le
ule3s1t
ules2
ulê6r-1w
u1lê1
ulêr2-1
ulf6a3pi
ul1fa
ulf3a2p
ul5i2n1s2
u1li
u1lo
ul5oo1g3
uloo2
ulp7ek1sa
ul1p
ulpe2k1s2
ulp7oo2r1t
ulpoo2
ulpoor1
ulp7or1ga
ulpor1g
ul4saa2
u2l1s2
ul1sa
ul4s6o2m1s2
ul1so
ulso2m
ult7in1ge
ul1t
ulti2ng
ult7ui2t.
ul1tui2t
u1lu
u2m
u3ma
um5a2g1t
uma1t4
uma5t3j
u3me
um4g6rok
u2m1g
um1g2r
u3mi
um4ie
um5o2n1d
um4s.
u2m1s2
ums7fel1d
um2s1f2
ums1fe
u3mu
u4mui
u3mu4s2
un5a2r1m
u1na
uner6s1t
u1ne
une2rs2
5uni1fo
u1ni
3uni1v2
unk7reda
u2n1k
unk2r
unk1re
unkre1d
u2n2s3
uns6e2n1b2
un1se
un4si2d
un3si
un5s6ka2p
un1sk2
uns1ka
un5s6kol
uns1ko
un7s6kool1
unskoo2
uns7la2g1g2
un2sl
un3sla
uns4la4g
uns7taal1
uns4taa2
uns1t
un5st2r
un4t7ee2n1h2
u2n1t
untee4n1
un6tin1n
unt7real
unt2r
un4tre1a
unt1re
unt6roe
unts6ko
un2t1s2
unt1sk2
unt5s1w
unug6s.
u1nu
unu2g3s2
u1o
u1pi6lo2p
u1p
up2il
upi1lo
u4p1ly
up2l
u4pon
u1ra
ur5aar
uraa2
ur3af
ur5a2g1t
u2rag
ur3ak
u5ra5s4t
uras2
ur5a2t1l
ura1t
ur5ee2n1
u1re
u4ref
u4r5ef1f
ure5u2m
urf7l4oo2p1
urfloo2
urg6h-s2
ur1g
ur2g1h2
urgh2-1
urg7laag
urglaa2
u4r5i2n1t
u1r2i
urke5s3
u2r1k
ur1ke
urk7nael
ur1k2n
urk1na
urkna1e
u1ro
uro7pe3si
uro2p
uro3pe
uropes2
urp7agti
ur1p
urpa2g1t
urr7hei2m
u2r1r2
urr1h2
urs7agte
u2rs2
ur1sa
ur2sag
ursa2g1t
ur4s5ek
ur1se
urs6fee
ur2s3f2
urs1fe
ur6sloo2
ur1sl
urs7mous2
ur2s1m
ur4s1no
ur1sn
ur4s5oo2
ur1so
ur6s7paar
ur1s1p
urspaa2
ur4s6par
ur4sp2r
urs6wee
urs3we
ur2s1w
urs6wie
urs3wi
ur6t5oor1
u2r1t
urtoo2
ur4to2p
ur4t7roo2m1
urt2r
urtroo4
u1ru
u1ry
u2s3ag
us2
u1sa
usa7l4a2g.
usa1la
usa2lag
u4sa2p
us5ee2n1
u1se
use5s1t
uses2
ush7die.
u2s1h2
ush1d
ush7koal
ush1ko
ushko1a
usie4k
u1si
u3sie
usie1k5l
u4s5i2n1s2
u2s3k2
u2s4k.
us4kok
us1ko
us4k1r2i
usk2r
u2s3l
u3s4lu
u4s1no
u1sn
u2s3o
u3s4ol
us4or
us3p
us4pie
u4spo
us5po2t
usse7u2s.
u2s2s2
us3se
usseus2
us3t
u2s4t.
us3t5a2k1t
usta6v.
usta1v2
us4t1b2
us4t1f
us4t1g
u2s4t1h2
us6ti2n1k
us3ti
us4to
us6trek
ust2r
ust1re
us5tru
us4t1s2
u2s3w
u2t
u3ta
u4t5a2d1m
uta2d
u4t3ag
uta7spek
utas4p
utas2
u3te
ute7li2ng
ute3li
ute7r6a1go
ute1ra
ute2r3ag
u3ti
u3to
u4top3l
uto2p
ut5or1g
ut4rek
ut2r
ut1re
uts7luis2
u2t1s2
ut1sl
ut4sp2r
uts1p
u3tu
u3ty
uu2
uur1
uu1r3i
uur6s5in
uu2rs2
uur1si
uus3
uus6khe
uu2s3k2
uus2k1h2
uut3j
uu2t
uwee2s4
u1w
uwe7s6mi2t
uwe2s1m
uwes2
uwes3mi
u5yste
uys3t
uys2
u3yu
û1
1ü1
1v2
vaar6s1t
vaa2
vaa2rs2
va4kar
va1ka
vak7eie.
va1ke
vakei1e
va4kes2
va4ki
va5ki2e
va4k3o
va4k2r
val7e4ste
va1le
vale3s1t
vales2
val7f4ee2s3
val4f3e
val7fu2n1k
val4fu
val7iso1g
va1li
valis2
vali1so
val4k7oë.
val1k
val1ko
val3ko1ë
val7opto
va1lo
valo2p
valo2p1t
val4s4a
va2l1s2
val6spa
vals1p
val3s7pan
val6spo
val6sp2r
val6s5te
val3s1t
val6s2t1h2
va4n5ee2
va1ne
van7ef1fe
va4nef1f
van6ga2p
va2ng
van1ga
van6g1re
van1g2r
van7ui2t.
va1nu
va2nui
vanui2t
vari5e1t
va1r2i
var6kja
va2r1k
vark1j
var6k1le
var1k2l
var4k5n
var4k5o
var4k5r
vas7en2t.
vas2
va1se
vase2n1t
vas6oor1
va4s3oo2
va1so
va5s7waai1
va2s3w
vaswaa2
ve2
ve3d
vee7ko2ng
vee2k
vee1ko
vee5k2r
vee4l
vee1r5a
vee2r
vee3s4
ve9ga.
ve1ga
veis4
vei5s3t
vel6don
vel1d
vel4d5r
vel5oo2
ve1lo
ve5lo2p
vel5s1m
ve2l1s2
vel7sp1le
vel2s3p2l
vels1p
ve5lu2m
ve1lu
ve3na
ve3ne
ve5nor
ve1no
ven4t5j
ve2n1t
ve3nu
vep7le1gi
ve1p
vep2l
vep1le
3ver1
ve9r4a.
ve1ra
ver1d4
ver5die2n7s8
ve5r4e1b2
ve1re
ve5r4ek
ver6ema
vere1m
ver6e1na
ve5r4e2n1d
ve2r6eve2
vere1v2
ver6flu
ver6fru
ver1f2r
ve3r2i
ve6r5in1n
ve2r1k4
ver5k2l
ver5k2w
ve7r6ona.
ve1ro
vero1na
ver5sa
ve2rs2
vers6ki
ver1sk2
ver7s5kin
vers8ko2p.
vers1ko
versko2p
ver5sl
ver5s1m
vers6mag
vers3ma
ver5s1p
ver7stal
ver1s1t
ver5s4w
vers8waar
verswaa2
ver4t5j
ve2r1t
ver5t1w
ve1s3p
ves2
ve1s3t
ves7taal1
ves4taa2
1v2e5su1v2
ve1su
vet5in
ve1t
vet5ji
vet2j
vet7op1ga
veto2p
veto2p1g
vet3r
ve2t1s4
vet5s1m
vid5s3o
vi2d
vi2d2s2
vie7ri2ng
vie1r2i
vi2g4s2
vi5rag
vi1r
vi4r1g
vi4r2-1
vi4s3ar
vis2
vi1sa
vi4so
vi3s5ol
vis7oo2g.
vi4soo1g3
visoo2
vis5t2r
vis3t
vi3t2r
vi2t
vit7rate
vi1tra1t4
vla2g5s2
v2lag
vla4k
vla7koek
vla1ko
vla6sak
vlas2
vla1sa
vle4k
v1le
vle1k5l
v4lie
v1li
vlie6so
vlies2
voe6r4ek
voe1re
voe6rui
voe1ru
voë4l
vo1ë
voël7oë.
voëlo1ë
vog7inho
vo1g
vo1gi
vogi2n1h2
vo4g2r
vo4lei
vo1le
vol4g5a
vol1g
vol6gon
vol1go
vo4l3o
vol7so2n3g
vo2l1s2
vol1so
vol7ui2t.
vo1lu
vo4lui2t
vol7ywer
vo1ly
voly1w
vond6s7te
vo2n1d
von2ds2
vond1s1t
von6klo
vo2n1k
von1k2l
voo7doo.
voo2
voo1d
voodoo2
voo2r5s4
voor1
vor4s5t
vo2rs2
vor7ster
vou7po2p1s2
vou1p
vou1po2p
vou5t2j
vou2t
vra6gry
v2rag
vr4a1g2r
v4r2e.
v1re
vree6t2j
vree1t
vreet7ji
vrie6s1p
v1r2i
vries2
vri6jze
vri1j
vrij1z
vry7duik
vry2d
vry7ky2k.
vry3s4
vry5s3t
vry7ui2t.
vryui2t
vu4e.
vu1e
vu9yo.
vyf7armi
vy4far
vy1fa
vyfa2r1m
vy3s2
1w
2w.
4wael
wa1e
wae6la1t
wae1la
4wa4e1o
3wa2g.
wag6las2
wag1l
wal6ste
wa2l1s2
wal3s1t
wand6sk2
wa2n1d
wan2ds2
wan6gaa2
wa2ng
wan1ga
wan7in1ge
wa1ni
wani2ng
wa2n1s4
wan5s1m
5wapen
wa2p
wa3pe
3wa2r1m
wa2r4s3
war3s6e.
war1se
4wa2r1t
war6t2hi
war2t1h2
war4t5j
war6to1ë
wart7oë.
war6too2
war4t5r
war6tys2
wa5s4hi
was2
wa2s1h2
was6kaa2
wa2s3k2
was1ka
was5la
wa2s3l
was6mou
wa2s3m
was7pa2n.
was3p
wa3s4pan
wa5st2r
was3t
wate6ra
wa1t
water7aa2
wat5so
wa2t1s2
we4ba2d
we3ba
we1b2
we4b1m
we4b5ru
web7taal1
we2b1t
webtaa2
web7v4lie
we2b1v2
webv1li
3we1d
we4d3r
we5d4ra
we5dry
we4dy
5weef1se
wee2f
wee2f1s2
weeg6s.
wee2g3s4
wee5ran
wee2r
wee1ra
wee5sa
wee2s3
wee7skaa2
wee1sk2
wees1ka
wee5s1ko
wee5sl
wee5s4p
wee5s1t
wee6tru
wee1t
weet2r
3weg
we4ga
weg7do2f.
we2g1d
weg2dof
weg3l
we4go
weg7orde
wegor1d
we4g3r
we2g3s4
weg5s1t
we4gu
4weis2
we4k5ro
we1k2r
wek7uu2r.
we1ku
wekuu2
wekuur1
we4l7aa2n1b2
we1la
welaa2
welaan1
we6lar1g
we4l5ee2
we3le
wel7f6lan
welf3l
wel7f6ron
wel2f3r
we4l5oor1
we1lo
weloo2
we4l5o2p
wel6s1ke
we2l1s2
wel1sk2
we4m3o
we1m
wem6o2s.
wemos2
we4nak
we1na
we4n5as2
wen7ee2n1s2
we1ne
wenee2
wenee2n1
wen6sa2d
we2n1s2
wen1sa
wen6s4an
wen6sar
wen6sei
wen1se
wen6ser
wen6s2es2
wen4sk2
wens5ka
wen7sku1d
wens1ku
wen4s5l
wen4so
wen6sp2r
wens1p
wen6ste
wens1t
wens7tes2
wen4s5u
wer7es3se
we3r4es2
we1re
were2s2s2
wer6fo2m
wer1fo
wer6gar
wer1g
wer1ga
wer6g1re
wer1g2r
we4r6i2n1t
we1r2i
3we2r1k
wer6ka2d
wer1ka
wer6k5af
wer6ke4s3
wer1ke
wer4k2l
werk7laa2
wer7klan
wer7kla2p
wer7klok
wer6ko2m1s2
wer1ko
wer3ko2m
wer6kon
wer7ko1ny
wer6k1re
werk2r
wer6kro
wer6kuu2
wer1ku
1wer4k2w
wer5kwa
wer4ky
we4r3o
wer6p1af
wer1p
wer6pan
wer6plo
werp2l
wer6pon
wer6poo2
wer6por
wer7sme1d
we2rs2
wer2s1m
wers3me
wer7ui2l.
we1ru
weru2il
wes6mi2t
we2s1m
wes2
wes3mi
wes7oewe
we1so
wesoe1w
we4s1p
wes7pemi
wespe1m
we4s3t
we5sta
we2s4t1h2
we5s4t2r
wes7waar
1we3s1w
weswaa2
3we2t.
we1t
wet7re1gu
wet2r
wet1re
wet4s5o
we2t1s2
we1t4s5t
wet7wy1si
wet4wy
1we2t1w
wet3wys2
3wêr
wê1
4wfon
w1fo
wids7tor
wi2d
wi2d2s2
wid1s1t
wie1l5a
wie4t5j
wie1t
wi4g2r
wi4k2l
wi4ko
wiks7te.
wi2k1s2
wiks1t
wil6da2g
w2il
wil1d
wil6sin
wi2l1s2
wil1si
wil4sk2
wind7a4s.
win4das2
wi2n1d
win6del
win6do2p
wind7o2p.
win4d2r
wind7ru2k3
win6k1le
wi2n1k
win1k2l
win4sk2
wi2n1s2
win7sky.
win4s5t
win7s6ton
win6ta2p
wi2n1t
win6tes2
wip7li2g.
wi2p
wi3p2l
wipli4g
wip1li
wip7roos2
wi3p2r
wiproo2
wit5el
wi2t
wi3te
wit7in2k1b2
wi3ti
wit4in
witi2n1k
wit5ji
wit2j
wi4t3o
wit5ro
wit2r
2w1j
wje6tun
wje1t
4woeg
woe4s2
wo4l3a
wol7invo
wo1li
wo4li2n1v2
wol6klo
wol1k
wol1k2l
wo4l3o
woor6d2r
woo2
woor1
woor1d
wo5r2u2m
wor1u
wou6da2g
wou1d
w2r
wree4
w1re
wri6gon
w1r2i
wri1go
2ws2
wur4g2r
wur1g
wu2r4m
wurm5a
2w1w
wwe7r6i2n1t
wwe1r2i
wyd5oo2
wy2d
wyd7ui3te
wydui2t
wyk6was2
1wy2k3w
wyn6a2n1d
wy2n1a
wyn5s4m
wy2n1s2
3wys2
wys7ak3si
wy1sa
wys2a2k1s4
wy2s3k2
wys3p
wys5ta
wys3t
wyt7raak1
wy2t
wyt2r
wytraa2
x'9ie.
x’9ie.
x1a
xe1
x3e1m
xerox7e.
xe1ro
xeroxe1
x2h2
x1i
xys6te.
xys3t
xys2
y1a
y4a3ma
ya2m
ybe6l2il
y1b2
ybe3li
y2d
y3da
y3de
yde2n4s2
ydge3le6
y2d1g
yd1ge
ydg6leu
ydg1le
y3di
y2d3of
yd3re
yd2r
yd3ro
yd4sin
y2ds2
yd1si
yd6ska1t
yd1sk2
yds1ka
yd6s7kri2t
ydsk2r
ydsk1r2i
yds7orde
yd2s1o
y1d4sor1d
y1e
y4en1n
yer2
yer7ho2f.
yer1h2
yer7maa1t1
yerm4a
ye2r1m
yermaa2
ye2r4s2
yer7to2n.
ye2r1t
yer7vi2l1l
yer1v2
yerv2il
yer7voë4l
yervo1ë
yes6a2g1t
yes2
ye1sa
ye2sag
3yeu
yf3aa2
y1fa
y4far
yf5a2s.
yfas2
yf3l
y2f3r
yf5ren
yf1re
yf4sl
y2f1s2
yf4su
y1g
yg4le
yg4li
yg4ly
yg5saa2
y2gs2
yg2s1a
ygs7ka2n1s2
yg2s1k2
ygs1ka
yg5s1ko
ygs5le
yg2s3l
yg4s6tek2
yg1s1t
yg4sto
yg4stu
ykaar4
y1ka
ykaa2
yker6s1t
y1ke
yke2rs2
y4k5i2n1s2
y1ki
y2k2l
yk3li
yk4lu
yk5lui
yk5lus2
yko2m1s4
y1ko
y3ko2m
y4kor
yk3r2i
yk2r
yk4s5a2d
y2k1s2
yk1sa
yk4sk2
yks7ka2n1s2
yk4skan
yks1ka
yk3s1p
yks4t
yk4su
y2k3w
y1la
y1lo
y4loe
yls7laar
y2l1s2
yl1sl
yls4laa2
y2n1a
yn4a.
y4nei
y1ne
y4n5e3te
yne1t
y2n1g2
yn5k3li
y2n1k
yn1k2l
yn5kwa
yn2k2w
y2n1o
y3n4o2m
yns6a2g1t
y2n1s2
yn2s3ag
yn1sa
yn4s5a2m
y2n1s5i2n1s2
yn3si
yn5s1ly
yn2sl
yn2s4m
yns7maan1
yns3ma
ynsmaa2
yn4s5or
yn1so
yn4s1p
yns7paar
ynspaa2
yns4t
y1n3u
yo9yo.
y2p
y3pa
y3pe
y3pi
y5plan
yp2l
yp3li
yp5or1g
y3p2r
y3pu
y1r
y4sa2m
ys2
y1sa
ys4ig
y1si
y4s5i2n1d
y4s5i2n1s2
y2sk2
ys5kar
ys1ka
ys3ko
y5s4koo2
y2s3l
y2s3n
y2s3o
ys4ok
y3s4ou
ys5poe
ys1p
ys3t
ys4ta
y4s5taf
y5s4tel
y4ster
y3s4t2r
ys4tu
ys3ui
y1su
y2s3w
y2t
y3ta
yt3ag
y3te
yt4ha
y2t1h2
y3ti
y3t2j
y3to
y3tu
y3ty
yve7sa2n1t
y1v2
yve2
yves4an
yves2
yve1sa
1z
2z.
4zbur
z1b2
zee7r6us3t
zee2r
zee1r3u
zeerus2
zen7el1le
ze1ne
zene2l1l
zi2c2
zi5ca1t
4zman
z1m
zook6a.
zoo2
zook3
zoo4ka
2z1z
2-1
-e2r4t
-ert5j
-ha-7ha.
-1h2
-ha2-1
-ha-1h2
-k4li
-1k2l
-na6ge1w
-1na
-na1ge
-s4ti
-s2
-s1t
-t4we
-1t
-2t1w
-5twee
.s8a8n8d8a8a8l.
.sa2n1d
.sandaa2
.sandaal1
